Mississippi, session 2026, SB3053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum of money, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of support, maintenance, affirmative action plan, interest funds and repairs at the state-supported institutions of higher learning; for support of Alcorn State University, Delta State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi State University, Mississippi University for Women, Mississippi Valley State University, University of Mississippi, and University of Southern Mississippi, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................ $   394,626,701.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum of money, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of the proceeds from any federal, student fees or other special source funds not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of support of education and general operations of Alcorn State University, Delta State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi State University, Mississippi University for Women, Mississippi Valley State University, University of Mississippi, and University of Southern Mississippi, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................ $ 1,276,857,208.00. SECTION 3.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are hereby appropriated out of any money in the Ayers Endowment interest fund for the purposes as set out by the courts in the Ayers Case for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027: Alcorn State University................. $ 424,500.00. Jackson State University................. $ 651,000.00. Mississippi Valley State University...... $       424,500.00. TOTAL:.......... $     1,500,000.00. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall allocate funds to the off-campus centers based on a minimum rate of sixty-five percent (65%) of the on-campus cost of a full-time equivalent student.  The on-campus distribution is to be determined without regard to the costs incurred by any one or more of them in the operation of off-campus degree-completing centers' classes.  Off-campus centers which are operated jointly by two (2) or more institutions, the amount allocated to such centers shall be prorated among the institutions jointly operating such centers based on the full-time equivalent enrollment of such centers. The board of trustees shall ensure that the off-campus centers are not charged with any indirect or overhead cost prorated from any on-campus activity.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the on-campus operations charge the off-campus centers with only actual direct charges. SECTION 5.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, the amount of One Hundred Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($145,000.00) shall be used for the promotion and expenses of the Mississippi Governor's School for the Gifted and Talented. Provided, however, that the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall develop the governing policy for faculty, course content and facilities selection on a competitive basis from all Mississippi senior colleges and universities.  The Mississippi Governor's School for the Gifted and Talented shall accept not less than one (1) high school student nominee from each accredited high school in Mississippi. The nominees, selected under criteria developed and adopted by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, shall be provided a two-week tuition-free program. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, the amount of Three Hundred Forty-nine Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($349,200.00) shall be used for the promotion and expenses of the Teacher Corps. SECTION 7.  It is the intent of the Legislature that no general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 8.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, the following amounts shall be used as set forth: (a)  For Mississippi State University as interest on agricultural land script fund and interest on sale of university land, the sum of..................................... $ 14,387.00. (b)  For the University of Mississippi as interest on original seminary fund, the sum of...................... $      32,643.00. (c)  For the University of Mississippi as interest on 1904 land grant fund, the sum of......................... $       9,965.00. (d)  For the University of Mississippi as interest on LaBauve Fund, the sum of............................... $       1,420.00. (e)  For Mississippi University for Women as interest on funds paid into the State Treasury as proceeds of sale of land donated to the Industrial Institute and College by the United States government, the sum of............................................ $ 9,389.00. (f)  For Alcorn State University as interest on land script and land sales funds, the sum of................... $      12,592.00. SECTION 9.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, the following amount shall be derived from Education Enhancement Funds deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972: On-campus and off-campus support of Alcorn State University, Delta State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi State University, Mississippi University for Women, Mississippi Valley State University, University of Mississippi, and University of Southern Mississippi for the sum of........................................ $  72,873,070.00. SECTION 10.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall first use special funds to the greatest extent possible to defray the costs of providing remediation at the state-supported institutions of higher learning. SECTION 11.  None of the funds appropriated by this act shall be expended for any purpose that is not actually required or necessary for performing any of the powers or duties of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or any of the powers or duties of any institution under the jurisdiction of the board of trustees, that are authorized by the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, state or federal law, or rules or regulations that implement state or federal law. SECTION 12.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the budget requests of the institutions for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning continue to review, and eliminate when possible, duplicating programs and degrees in the existing institutions of higher learning in this state. SECTION 14.  No state appropriations or student tuition and fee receipts, except those specifically charged for the provision of the services, shall be used to support auxiliary enterprises, with the exception of intercollegiate athletics at a level designated by the board of trustees.  It is the intent of the Legislature that auxiliary enterprises shall be self-supporting and that deficits not be taken from funds intended for instruction and academic programs. SECTION 15.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall report yearly to the Legislature the institution compliance with Section 97-11-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, which prohibits deficit spending. SECTION 16.  Any funds appropriated pursuant to this act and paid as a fee to or deposited in a financial institution shall be in compliance with Section 109 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi and Section 25-4-105, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 17.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2027 Performance Measures                                       Target Instruction Number of undergraduate degrees awarded.               12,221 Number of graduate degrees awarded.                    4,592 Number of degrees (Graduate & Undergraduate) awarded in the STEM Field           3,463 Number of degrees (Graduate & Undergraduate) awarded in the Health Field                                              830 Number of degrees (Graduate & Undergraduate) awarded in the Education Field                                            1,044 Number of undergraduate degrees awarded per 100 undergraduate full-time equivalent (FTE) enrollment.                      23.20 Number of graduate degrees awarded per 100 graduate FTE enrollment.                      44.00 Number of students completing 30 hours                13,915 Number of students completing 60 hours                10,132 Research Number of patents obtained by Mississippi public universities in emerging technologies                                25 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2028. SECTION 18.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following amount, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be allocated equally to Jackson State University, Mississippi State University, the University of Mississippi, and the University of Southern Mississippi for economic development, reorganization, and relocation of efforts at those universities................................... $ 2,000,000.00. SECTION 19.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following amount, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be allocated to Mississippi State University - Meridian Branch.................................... .............................................. $ 900,000.00. SECTION 20.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 21.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following amount, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be allocated to Jackson State University E-Learning Center................... $     485,000.00. SECTION 22.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following amount, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be allocated to the Delta State University E-Learning Center.................................... .............................................. $ 155,000.00. SECTION 23.  None of the State General Funds appropriated by this act shall be expended for the purpose of travel outside the United States. SECTION 24.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be allocated to Delta State University Department of Commercial Aviation............................... ............................................... $ 800,000.00. SECTION 25.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 and Section 2 of this act, One Hundred Ninety-one Thousand Six Hundred Ten Dollars ($191,610.00) is provided for geospatial site licenses. SECTION 26.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the funds provided herein shall be used to pay certain utilities for state-furnished housing for any employees.  Such utilities shall include electricity, natural gas, butane, propane, cable and phone services.  Where actual cost cannot be determined, the agency shall be required to provide meters to be in compliance with legislative intent.  Such state-furnished housing shall include single-family and multifamily residences but shall not include any dormitory residences.  Allowances for such utilities shall be prohibited. SECTION 27.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following amount shall be allocated to the Delta State University Delta Center for Culture and Learning....................................... $    100,000.00. The funds allocated in this section shall only be used for the Delta Center for Culture and Learning. SECTION 28.  Of the funds provided herein to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the following amount, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be allocated to fund the Washington Center for Internships and Academic Seminars Mississippi Initiative Scholarship Program.................................. ................................................ $ 90,000.00. This program will provide opportunities for Mississippi's university and college students to gain real-life experience working in Washington, D.C., and through attending short course Academic Seminars.  The funding will provide scholarships at Alcorn State University, Delta State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi State University, Mississippi University for Women, Mississippi Valley State University, and the University of Southern Mississippi.  A written report shall be submitted listing the scholarship recipients by university to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Appropriations and Universities and Colleges Committees. SECTION 29.  None of the funds appropriated and/or authorized for expenditure under this act shall be used for research in which a human embryo is killed or destroyed. SECTION 30.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, an amount not more than One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) shall be allocated to implement university system efficiencies, including, but not limited to, academic, space, energy and any other system projects or expenditures that would lead to improved efficiency.  Such funds may also be used to draw down other funds or as matching funds. SECTION 31.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($900,000.00) shall be used to defray the expenses of the Children's Center for Communication and Development at the University of Southern Mississippi. SECTION 32.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, the amount of One Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,100,000.00) is provided for defraying the expenses of the DuBard School at the University of Southern Mississippi. SECTION 33.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, Two Hundred Sixty-six Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($266,750.00) is provided for the Southwest Mississippi Center for Culture and Learning at Alcorn State University. SECTION 34. Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that Eight Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($850,000.00) is provided for the Engineer Research and Development Center in Vicksburg, Mississippi, for Research and Development opportunities in Science and Technology initiatives. SECTION 35. Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) is provided for the Delta State University Delta Music Institute. SECTION 36. Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Six Hundred Thousand Dollars ($600,000.00) is provided for the T.K. Martin Center to study the IDEA Part C Early Intervention System in Mississippi and Mississippi's Laws Regarding Early Intervention, as established by Senate Bill 2167, 2023 Regular Session. SECTION 37.  It is the intention of the Legislature that Mississippi Valley State University is authorized to provide water or sewer service to any existing, privately owned structures that presently take water or sewer service from Mississippi Valley State University.  Furthermore, Mississippi Valley State University is authorized to charge a flat or metered rate for the service provided. Mississippi Valley State University shall not provide any water or sewer service to any new, privately owned structures. SECTION 38.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00), shall be derived from funds in the Education Enhancement Fund deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided to Alcorn State University for STEM related programs as determined by the university. SECTION 39.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), or so much as necessary, shall be derived from funds in the Education Enhancement Fund deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office.  These funds are provided to the IHL research institutions for the purpose of technology transfer and entrepreneurial programs, which may be connected to the Department of Defense and related federal research in Mississippi.  It is the intent of the legislature that funds can be used for both research and upgrades to the physical space in order to perform research and entrepreneurship. SECTION 40.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), or so much thereof, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the 2023 Declaration of Independence Center for the Study of American Freedom Fund, as created in Section 37-115-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to support the operations of the Declaration of Independence Center for the Study of American   Freedom ("Center") at the University of Mississippi, subject to the conditions that the Center shall: (a)  Promote scholarly research and civic education by exploring the principles of freedom expressed in our country's founding documents; (b)  Support individual faculty members at institutions of higher learning who have been named Declaration Fellows and who actively participate in the Center's network of scholars and further the mission and principles of the Center; (c)  Support classes, activities, and internships that advance students' understanding of American freedom at both the secondary and post-secondary level of education, including support for the operation of any Freedom Studies minor that may be available for academic credit at the University of Mississippi, as well as support for all Freedom Studies courses belonging to this minor; and (d)  Continue to be governed and advised in accordance with the Center governing structure described in the last paragraph of the Center mission statement signed by the Chancellor, Provost and founding Director of the Center and received in the Office of the Chancellor on March 1, 2023. SECTION 41.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Education Enhancement Funds to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning, as authorized in Senate Bill 2001, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................. $ 9,572,614.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds as allocated herein: (a)  University of Mississippi to defray expenses related to the operations of the Haley Barbour Center for the Study of American Politics............................................... $    900,000.00. (b)  University of Mississippi to defray expenses related to the Healthcare Innovation Tech Hub Infrastructure, Biomedical Innovation, Nano-Bio Immuno Engineering Consortium (NIEC), Data Science and Artificial Intelligence........................ $   2,300,000.00. (c)  Mississippi University for Women to defray expenses related to the expansion of the nursing program............................ .............................................. $ 2,472,614.00. (d)  Alcorn State University to defray the expenses related to the repair, renovation, expansion, construction, furnishing and equipping of the Davey L. Whitney Complex and Wellness Center................ .............................................. $ 3,000,000.00. (e)  IHL research institutions for the purpose of technology transfer and entrepreneurial programs, which may be connected to the Department of Defense and related federal research in Mississippi: Jackson State University.................... $ 250,000.00 University of Mississippi................... $ 400,000.00 University of Southern Mississippi........... $ 250,000.00 Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 42.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning (IHL), as authorized in Senate Bill 2001, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 2,000,000.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds for the University of Southern Mississippi Ocean Enterprise  Gulfport. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 43.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Education Enhancement Funds to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning, as authorized in Senate Bill 2001, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................ $  3,731,137.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds as allocated herein: (a)  Delta State University  Commercial Aviation Department to defray expenses related to the construction and/or repair and renovation of hangers and classrooms, the purchase of flight simulators, training equipment, and the purchase and/or refurbishment of aircraft.... $   1,000,000.00. (b)  Mississippi University for Women to defray expenses related to capital needs, construction, and/or repair and renovation projects $ 500,000.00. (c)  Alcorn State University to defray expenses related to capital needs, construction, and/or repair and renovation projects....... .............................................. $ 2,231,137.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 44.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning (IHL), acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management as authorized in Senate Bill 2001, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027..... .............................................. $ 2,800,000.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of providing the funds necessary to authorize the expenditure of funds for the Institutions of Higher Learning as allocated herein: Alcorn State University to defray expenses related to repair and renovation upgrades to existing facilities................ $   2,500,000.00. MS University of Women to defray expenses related to the Painter Hall renovation............................. $   300,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 45.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Education Enhancement Funds to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning, as authorized in Senate Bill 2001, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................ $  1,325,190.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds as allocated herein: Delta State University to defray the costs associated with designing, constructing, maintaining, and operating a model rural education school in a partnership with the Cleveland School District to serve PreK through sixth-grade students from Bolivar County ........................ $ 1,325,190.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 46. The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of General Funds to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning, as authorized in Senate Bill 2001, 2025 First Extraordinary Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.. $   250,000.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds as allocated herein: (a)  DuBard School at the University of Southern Mississippi...................................... $ 200,000.00. (b) T.K. Martin Center to study the IDEA Part C Early Intervention System in Mississippi and Mississippi's Laws Regarding Early Intervention................................................. $   50,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year. In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 47.  (1) It is the intention of the Legislature that the Board of Trustees of the State Institutions of Higher Learning shall: (a)  Report, by July 1, 2026, the methodology of and basis for the calculation and distribution of general fund and special fund monies, including any federal monies, appropriated by the Mississippi Legislature to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for fiscal year 2021 thru fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of support of each of the eight IHL institutions. (b)  Report, by December 1, 2026, the Board of Trustees of the State Institutions of Higher Learnings analysis and recommendations to address the population shifts within the state, the declining national birth rate, and the pending enrollment cliffs impact on all IHL institutions. (c)  Report, by December 1, 2026, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learnings analysis and recommendations to address graduation rate disparities and how to improve graduation rates across all IHL institutions. (2)  The reports required by this section shall be made to the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, and the Legislative Budget Office. SECTION 48.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 49.  Of the funds appropriated, it is the intention and priority of the Legislature that the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning give consideration for salary increases for all academic faculty including technical, vocational, and other support staff that are essential to the education and training of students.  Funds are provided herein for a Two Thousand Dollar ($2,000.00) salary increase for all professors at each campus at the discretion of the President. SECTION 50.  Of the funds appropriated under the provision of Section 2 of this act, the following sum, or so much necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Institutions of Higher Learning (IHL), acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... ............................................. $ 20,000,000.00. This appropriation is made for the purpose of providing the funds necessary to authorize the expenditure of funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects for the Institutions of Higher Learning and shall be allocated to the universities as follows: fifty percent (50%) based on total building square footage and fifty percent (50%) based on the in-person student enrollment for the Fall 2025 and Spring 2026. SECTION 51.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 52.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2026.